Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
514B

CONDOMINIUMS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

514B-1 Short title

514B-2
Applicability

514B-3
Definitions

514B-4
Separate titles and taxation

514B-5 Conformance with county land use laws

514B-6
Supplemental county rules governing a condominium

property
regime

514B-7
Construction against implicit repeal

514B-8
Severability

514B-9
Obligation of good faith

514B-10
Remedies to be liberally administered

Part II. Applicability

514B-21
Applicability to new condominiums

514B-22
Applicability to preexisting condominiums

514B-23
Amendments to governing instruments

Part III. Creation, Alteration, and
Termination

of Condominiums

514B-31 Creation

514B-32 Contents of declaration

514B-33 Condominium map

514B-34 Condominium map; certification of
architect,

engineer, or surveyor

514B-35 Unit boundaries

514B-36 Leasehold units

514B-37 Common interest

514B-38 Common elements

514B-39 Limited common elements

514B-40 Transfer of limited common elements

514B-41 Common profits and expenses

514B-42 Metering of utilities

514B-43 Liens against units

514B-44 Contents of deeds or leases of units

514B-45 Blanket mortgages and other blanket liens
affecting

a unit at time of first conveyance or
lease

514B-46 Merger of projects or increments

514B-47 Removal from provisions of this chapter

Part IV. Registration and Administration

of Condominiums

514B-51 Registration required; exceptions

514B-52 Application for registration

514B-53 Inspection by commission

514B-54 Developer's public report; requirements
for issuance

of effective date

514B-55 Developer's public report; request for
hearing by

developer

514B-56 Developer's public report; amendments

514B-57 Commission oversight of developer's
public report

514B-58 Annual report

514B-59 Expiration of developer's public reports

514B-60 No false or misleading information

514B-61 General powers and duties of commission

514B-62 Deposit of fees

514B-63 Condominium specialists; appointment;
duties

514B-64 Private consultants

514B-65 Investigative powers

514B-66 Cease and desist orders

514B-67 Termination of registration

514B-68 Power to enjoin

514B-69 Penalties

514B-70 Limitation of actions

514B-71 Condominium education trust fund

514B-72 Condominium education trust fund;
payments

by associations and developers

514B-73 Condominium education trust fund;
management

Part
V. Protection of Condominium Purchasers

A.
General Provisions

514B-81 Applicability; exceptions

514B-82 Sale of units

514B-83 Developer's public report

514B-84 Developer's public report; special types
of

condominiums

514B-85 Preregistration solicitation

514B-86 Requirements for binding sales contracts;

purchaser's right to cancel

514B-87 Rescission after sales contract becomes
binding

514B-88 Delivery

514B-89 Sales contracts before completion of
construction

514B-90 Refunds upon cancellation or termination

514B-91 Escrow of deposits

514B-92 Use of purchaser deposits to pay project
costs

514B-93 Early conveyance to pay project costs

514B-94 Misleading statements and omissions;
remedies

B.
Sales to Owner-Occupants

514B-95 Definitions

514B-95.5 Announcement or advertisement;
publication

514B-96 Designation of residential units

514B-96.5 Unit selection; requirements

514B-97 Affidavit

514B-97.5 Prohibitions

514B-98 Sale of residential units; developer
requirements

514B-98.5 Enforcement

514B-99 Penalties

514B-99.3 False statement

514B-99.5 Inapplicability of laws

Part
VI. Management of Condominiums

A.
Powers, Duties, and Other General Provisions

514B-101
Applicability; exceptions

514B-102
Association; organization and membership

514B-103 Association; registration

514B-104 Association; powers

514B-105
Association; limitations on powers

514B-106
Board; powers and duties

514B-106.5
Service of process

514B-107
Board; limitations

514B-113 Medical marijuana; discrimination

514B-108
Bylaws

514B-109 Restatement of declaration and bylaws

514B-110
Bylaws amendment permitted; mixed use property;

representation on board

514B-111 Judicial power to excuse compliance with

requirements of declaration or bylaws

514B-112
Condominium community mutual obligations

B.
Governance - Elections and Meetings

514B-121
Association meetings

514B-122 Association meetings; minutes

514B-123
Association meetings; voting; proxies

514B-124 Association
meetings; purchaser's right to vote

514B-124.5
Voting for elections; cumulative voting

514B-125 Board meetings

514B-126 Board meetings; minutes

C. Operations

514B-131
Operation of the property

514B-132
Managing agents

514B-133 Association employees; background check; prohibition

514B-134 Management and contracts; developer,
managing

agent, and association

514B-135 Termination
of contracts and leases of developer

514B-136 Transfer
of developer rights

514B-137
Upkeep of condominium

514B-138
Upkeep of condominium; high-risk components

514B-139
Upkeep of condominium; disposition of

unclaimed
possessions

514B-140
Additions to and alterations of condominium

514B-141 Tort
and contract liability; tolling

of
limitation period

514B-142
Aging in place or disabled; limitation on liability

514B-143
Insurance

514B-144
Association fiscal matters; assessments for

common expenses

514B-145
Association fiscal matters; collection of unpaid

assessments from tenants or rental agents

514B-146
Association fiscal matters; lien for assessments

514B-147
Association fiscal matters; other liens affecting

the
condominium

514B-148
Association fiscal matters; budgets and reserves

514B-149
Association fiscal matters; handling and disbursement

of
funds

514B-150
Association fiscal matters; audits, audited

financial statement

514B-151
Association fiscal matters; lease rent renegotiation

514B-152
Association records; generally

514B-153
Association records; records to be maintained

514B-154
Association records; availability; disposal;

prohibitions

514B-154.5
Association documents to be provided

514B-155
Association as trustee

514B-156
Pets

514B-157
Attorneys' fees, delinquent assessments, and

expenses of enforcement

D.
Alternative Dispute Resolution

514B-161
Mediation

514B-162
Arbitration

514B-163 Trial
de novo and appeal

Note

Election to register a chapter 514A condominium under chapter
514B. L 2005, c 93, §9; L 2007, c 244, §8.

Section 16-53-16.8 and chapter 16-107, subchapter 6, Hawaii
Administrative Rules, remain in effect until new rules are adopted. L 2005, c
93, §10 and L 2006, c 273, §34.

Cross References

Building permit requirements on new developments in school
impact districts, see §46-142.5.

Placement of clotheslines, see §196-8.5.

Applicability of Chapter

See §§514B-21 to 23.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next